Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Blue Alert System

§ 45-1-151.
Blue alert program established; definitions; activation; termination of activation.

There is established a statewide alert system known as “Blue Alert” which shall be developed and implemented by the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different definition, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the search for a suspect in a case involving the death or serious injury of a peace officer.

“Peace Officer” means a law enforcement officer as defined in Section 45-6-3.

“Director” means the director of the Bureau of Investigation.

The “Blue Alert” system may be activated when a suspect for a crime involving the death or serious injury of a peace officer has not been apprehended, and law enforcement personnel have determined that the suspect may be a serious threat to the public.

Upon notification by a law enforcement agency that a suspect in a case involving the death or serious injury of a peace officer has not been apprehended and may be a serious threat to the public, the director shall activate the “Blue Alert” system and notify appropriate participants in the “Blue Alert” system, as established by rule, if:

A law enforcement agency believes that a suspect has not been apprehended;

A law enforcement agency believes that the suspect may be a serious threat to the public; and

Sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the suspect.

The area of the alert may be less than statewide if the director determines that the nature of the event makes it probable that the suspect did not leave a certain geographic location.

Before requesting activation of the “Blue Alert” system, a law enforcement agency shall verify that the criteria described by this section have been satisfied. The law enforcement agency shall assess the appropriate boundaries of the alert based on the nature of the suspect and the circumstances surrounding the crime.

The director shall terminate any activation of the “Blue Alert” system with respect to a particular suspect if:

The suspect is located or the incident is otherwise resolved; or

The director determines that the “Blue Alert” system is no longer an effective tool for locating the suspect.

Any entity or individual involved in the dissemination of a “Blue Alert” generated pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages arising from that dissemination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.